Georgia, session 2025_26, HB479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits relative to income taxes, is amended
by revising subsection (c) of Code Section 48-7-29.16, relating to tax credits for
contributions to student scholarship organizations, as follows:
"(c) A corporation or other entity shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter for qualified education expenses in an amount not to exceed the actual amount
expended or 75 percent of the corporation's such entity's estimated income tax liability, as
provided to the department under paragraph (3) of subsection (f) of this Code section,
whichever is less."
H. B. 479
- 1 -

LC 59 0087
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising subsection (c) of Code Section 48-7-29.20,
relating to tax credits for contributions to rural hospital organizations, as follows:
"(c) A corporation or other entity shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter for qualified rural hospital organization expenses in an amount not to exceed the
actual amount expended or 75 percent of the corporation's such entity's estimated income
tax liability, as provided to the department under paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of this
Code section, whichever is less."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by revising subsection (c) of Code Section 48-7-29.21,
relating to tax credits for donations to nonprofit corporations awarding grants to public
schools, as follows:
"(c) A corporation or other entity shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter for qualified education donations in an amount not to exceed the actual amount
donated or 75 percent of the corporation's such entity's estimated income tax liability, as
provided to the department under paragraph (3) of subsection (f) of this Code section,
whichever is less."
SECTION 4.
Said article is further amended by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (b.1) of Code Section
48-7-29.24, relating to tax credits for contributions to foster child support organizations, as
follows:
"(4) In the case of a corporation or other entity not provided for in paragraphs (1)
through (3) of this subsection, 10 percent of such entity's estimated income tax liability,
as provided to the department under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of this Code section."
H. B. 479
- 2 -

LC 59 0087
SECTION 5.
Said article is further amended by revising subparagraph (b)(2)(D) of Code Section
48-7-29.25, relating to tax credits for contributions to law enforcement foundations, as
follows:
"(D) A corporation or other entity not provided for in subparagraphs (A) through (C)
of this paragraph shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter, for
qualified contributions in an amount not to exceed the actual amount of qualified
contributions made or 75 percent of such corporation's or other entity's estimated
income tax liability, as provided to the department under paragraph (1) of subsection (e)
of this Code section, whichever is less."
SECTION 6.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 7.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 479
- 3 -